src/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@
@U.ASPECT.PFV@
@U.ASPECT.FUT@
@U.ASPECT.OPT@
@U.TAMA.%0@
@U.TAMA.aa@
@U.TAMA.n@
@U.TAMA.dh@
@U.TAMA.u@
@U.VV.%0@
@U.VV.D@
@U.VV.H@
@U.VV.L@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.1@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.2@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ 
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@
@D.PREFIX@
@R.PREFIX.INNER@
@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@
@R.PREFIX.OUTER@ 


LEXICON Root

0-IPFV ;
aa-IPFV ;
n-IPFV ;
aa-PFV ;
n-PFV ;
dh-PFV ;
aa-FUT ;
u-OPT ;


!
! 0-IPFV
!
LEXICON 0-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@         0-IPFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   0-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  0-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0-IPFV-0-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.D@@D.PREFIX@         0-IPFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   0-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  0-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   0-IPFV-D-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.H@@D.PREFIX@         0-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   0-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  0-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0-IPFV-H-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.L@@D.PREFIX@         0-IPFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   0-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  0-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0-IPFV-L-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@E     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@  #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@  #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@et    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@et     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@et     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@et #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@et    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@et     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@et     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@et #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-D-AFF-OuterPrefix
! TODO: These will only work with CV disjunct prefixes. Will need other 
! set or rule for CVC prefixes (although there aren't many)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@'ish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@'in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@'et    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@et     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@'at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@et     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@et #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@eh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@eh     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@eh     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@eh #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@eh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@eh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@eh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@eh #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@agn   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@el    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@el     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@el     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@el #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix
! TODO: There are distinct forms here if these chunks are preceded by an areal
! prefix hu-, the conative uu-, and the transitional i-.  We'll probably need
! to define separate variants of this set to cover these cases later on.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@agn   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@el    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@el    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@el    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@el #;


!
! aa-IPFV
!
LEXICON aa-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@         aa-IPFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   aa-IPFV-0-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@D.PREFIX@         aa-IPFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   aa-IPFV-D-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@D.PREFIX@         aa-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   aa-IPFV-H-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@D.PREFIX@         aa-IPFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   aa-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  aa-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.aa@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   aa-IPFV-L-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@aa    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aa    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aa    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@aa #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ih    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įį    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@aa    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aa    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aa    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@aa #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ish    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@in    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@at #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ah #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ah #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ak    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ah #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@agn    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al #;

LEXICON aa-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@agn    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@įl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@al #;

!
! n-IPFV
!

LEXICON n-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@         n-IPFV-0-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-IPFV-0-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-IPFV-0-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@D.PREFIX@         n-IPFV-D-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-IPFV-D-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.D@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-IPFV-D-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@D.PREFIX@         n-IPFV-H-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-IPFV-H-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.H@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-IPFV-H-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@D.PREFIX@         n-IPFV-L-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   n-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  n-IPFV-L-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
!@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.n@@U.VV.L@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  n-IPFV-L-AFF-OuterPrefix ;
